Utah statutes.
41-6a-1303.   Passing a school bus complaint procedure.

(1) (a)  An operator of a school bus who observes a violation of Subsection 41-6a-1302(2) or (3) may prepare a report, in a manner specified by the school district, to the school district transportation coordinator no more than two working days after the alleged violation occurred.

(b)  The report under Subsection (1)(a) shall contain:

(i)  the date, time, and location of the violation;

(ii)  the license plate number and state and description of the offending vehicle;

(iii)  as much as practical, a description of the operator of the offending vehicle;

(iv)  a description of the incident involving the violation;

(v)  information on how to contact the school bus operator who witnessed the offense; and

(vi)  the signature of the operator of the school bus who witnessed the offense attesting to the accuracy of the report.

(2) (a)  Upon receipt of a report in accordance with Subsection (1), the school district transportation coordinator shall promptly send a notification letter to the last-known registered owner of the vehicle.

(b)  The notification letter shall include:

(i)  the applicable information on the school bus operator's report stating that the vehicle was observed passing a school bus displaying alternating flashing red lights in violation of state law;

(ii)  a complete explanation of the applicable provisions of Section 41-6a-1302; and

(iii)  an explanation that the notification letter is not a peace officer citation but is an effort to call attention to the seriousness of the incident.

(c)  The school district transportation coordinator may file the report with the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction for the alleged violation.

(3)  A law enforcement agency that receives a report in accordance with Subsection (2) may have a peace officer initiate an investigation of the reported violation.

